Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1019
State-owned vehicle; use state fuel; surcharge.

(1) Any person using a vehicle owned by the transportation services bureau shall, whenever possible, obtain fuel from state-owned facilities.

(2) The bureau may place a surcharge on any agency whose employees have not complied with subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 17.